Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 2 Displaying of Watercraft Information

Cross references.

Tagging and identification requirements for vessels licensed by department, §

27-4-117

.

52-7-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Capacity plate” means a plate attached to watercraft with information thereon as provided in this article.

“Manufacturer” means a person, firm, or corporation who constructs or assembles a watercraft or alters a watercraft in such manner as to change its weight capacity.

“Watercraft” means any boat, vessel, or craft, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, which is less than 26 feet in length and is designed to carry two or more persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 1.

52-7-41.
Requirement as to attachment of capacity plates to vessels generally.

It shall be unlawful to manufacture, sell, or offer for sale in this state any watercraft to which a capacity plate has not been attached.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 2.

52-7-42.
Information to be marked on capacity plate.

A capacity plate shall bear the following information, permanently marked thereon in such manner as to be clearly visible and legible from the position designed or normally intended to be occupied by the operator of the watercraft when the watercraft is in operation:

For all watercraft designed for or represented by the manufacturer as being suitable for use with an outboard motor:

The total weight of all persons, motor, gear, and other articles which the watercraft is capable of carrying with safety under normal conditions;

The recommended number of persons commensurate with the weight capacity of the watercraft and the presumed weight in pounds of each such person; but in no instance shall such presumed weight per person be less than 150 pounds;

Clear notice that the information appearing on the capacity plate is applicable under normal conditions and that the weight of the outboard motor and associated equipment is considered to be part of the total weight capacity; and

The maximum horsepower of the motor which the watercraft is designed or intended to accommodate.

For all other watercraft to which this article applies:

The total weight of all persons, gear, and other articles which the watercraft is capable of carrying with safety under normal conditions;

The recommended number of persons commensurate with the weight capacity of the watercraft and the presumed weight in pounds of each such person; but in no instance shall such presumed weight per person be less than 150 pounds; and

Clear notice that the information appearing on the capacity plate is applicable under normal conditions.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 3.

52-7-43.
Determination of maximum capacity.

The information relating to maximum capacity which is required to appear on capacity plates by Code Section 52-7-42 shall be determined in accordance with such methods and formulas as shall be prescribed by rules or regulations adopted by the Board of Natural Resources. In prescribing such methods and formulas, the Board of Natural Resources shall be guided by and give due regard to the necessity for uniformity in methods and formulas lawful for use in determining small watercraft capacity in the several states and to any methods and formulas which may be recognized or recommended by the United States Coast Guard or any successor agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 4.

52-7-44.
Affixing of capacity plate by person other than vessel manufacturer; effect of such action on liability of manufacturer.

Any person may affix a capacity plate to any watercraft to which this article applies and which does not have a capacity plate meeting the requirements of law affixed thereto by the manufacturer thereof in accordance with such rules and regulations as the Board of Natural Resources may prescribe. Such watercraft may thereafter be offered for sale in this state. However, no action pursuant to this Code section, or in the manner described herein, shall relieve any manufacturer from liability for failure to comply with the requirements of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 5.

52-7-45.
Information on capacity plate as constituting a warranty; nature of warranty.

The information appearing on a capacity plate shall be deemed to be a warranty:

That the manufacturer or other person affixing a capacity plate as permitted by Code Section 52-7-44 has correctly and faithfully employed a method and formula for the calculation of maximum weight capacity prescribed by the Board of Natural Resources;

That the information appearing on the capacity plate, with respect to maximum weight capacity and recommended number of persons, is the result of the application of such method and formula; and

With respect to information concerning horsepower limitations, that such information is not a deliberate or negligent misrepresentation.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 6.

Cross references.

Warranties generally, §

11-2-312

et seq.

52-7-46.
Alternative compliance with article if affixing of capacity plate deemed impracticable or undesirable.

If any watercraft which is required by this article to have a capacity plate affixed thereto is of such design or construction as to make it impracticable or undesirable to affix such plate, the manufacturer or other person having the responsibility for affixing the plate may represent such impracticability or undesirability in writing to the Department of Natural Resources. Upon determination by the Department of Natural Resources that such representation has merit and that a proper and effective substitute for the capacity plate, which will serve the same purpose, is feasible, the Department of Natural Resources may authorize such alternative compliance. Such alternative compliance shall thereafter be deemed compliance with the capacity plate requirements of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 7.

52-7-47.
Exemption of watercraft by rules and regulations of Board of Natural Resources.

The Board of Natural Resources may, by rules and regulations, exempt any watercraft from the requirements of this article which it finds to be of such unconventional design or construction that the information required on capacity plates would not assist in promoting safety or that such information is not reasonably obtainable.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 8.

52-7-48.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by Board of Natural Resources generally.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized to promulgate, issue, and amend rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 9.

52-7-49.
Exemption of watercraft manufactured for personal use.

Nothing contained within this article shall be construed so as to apply to any person who shall manufacture or construct a watercraft for his own personal use and so long as such watercraft remains the property of the person who manufactured or constructed such watercraft.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 10.

52-7-50.
Applicability of article.

This article shall apply to watercraft manufactured after January 1, 1972.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 11.

52-7-51.
Penalty.

Any person who violates this article or any rules and regulations issued hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. For purposes of establishing criminal violations of the rules and regulations promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources as provided in this article, the term “rules and regulations” means those rules and regulations of the Board of Natural Resources in force and effect on January 1, 2014.

Failure to affix a proper capacity plate shall constitute a separate violation for each watercraft with respect to which such failure occurs.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 419, § 12; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 30/HB 869; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 13/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 4/HB 783.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 5/HB 783, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on May 1, 2014, and shall apply to offenses occurring on or after such date.”